Florida, session 2026, HB1257.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 201.0202, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
201.0202 Documentary stamp tax on additional property.—
(1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), on any
residential property transaction subject to the tax imposed by
s. 201.02(1), there shall be an additional tax of $50,000 if the
purchaser already owns 15 residential properties in this state.
(b) A not-for-profit corporation purchasing residential
housing for the purpose of providing affordable housing is not
required to pay the tax in this section unless they already own
50 residential properties in this state.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the tax shall be
collected at the same time and in the same manner as the tax
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1257-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1257 2026
under s. 201.02 and shall be transferred to the Department of
Revenue and used to provide down payment assistance grants to
first-time homeowners.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1257-00